Utah statutes.
75-5b-401.   Registration of guardianship orders.
If a guardian has been appointed in another state and a petition for the
appointment of a guardian is not pending in this state, the guardian appointed
in the other state, after giving notice to the appointing court of an intent
to register, may register the guardianship order in this state by filing
certified copies of the order and letters of office as a foreign judgment in a
court in any appropriate county of this state.
